Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.29
Private label, defined.

Private label means a
label which the purchasing wholesaler or retailer has protected, in whole
or in part, by a trademark registration or which the purchasing wholesaler
or retailer has otherwise protected pursuant to state or federal statutory
or common law.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 37.